Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1282.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 9-500.19, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE9-500.19. Vehicle refueling apparatus Notwithstanding any other law and because the legislature finds it is a matter of statewide concern, a city or town shall not effectively prohibit the installation or use of a vehicle refueling apparatus as defined in section 43-1086.01.  This section does not preclude a city or town from ensuring the proper installation of a vehicle refueling apparatus to protect public health and safety.END_STATUTE